test/src/morphology/adj-es.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
  Adjective - dimes: # 
    dimes+A+Attr: dibma
    dimes+A+Sg+Nom: dimes
    dimes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: dibmasabbo
    dimes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dibmasamos

  Adjective - sádnes: # 
    sádnes+A+Attr: sádnes
    sádnes+A+Sg+Nom: sádnes
    sádnes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [sáddnáp, sáddnásabbo]
    sádnes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [sáddnásmus, sáddnásamos]

  Adjective - tjoaskes: # 
    tjoaskes+A+Attr: tjoaskes 
    tjoaskes+A+Sg+Nom: tjoaskes 
    tjoaskest+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásabbo
    tjoaskest+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásamos, tjoasskámus

  Adjective - vijdes: # 
    vijdes+A+Attr: vijdes 
    vijdes+A+Sg+Nom: vijdes
    vijdes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [vijddáp, vijddásabbo]
    vijdes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [vijddámus, vijddásamos]


  Adjective - vájves: #  
    vájves+A+Attr: vájves
    vájves+A+Sg+Nom: vájves
    vájves+A+Sg+Gen: vájvvása
    vájves+A+Sg+Acc: vájvvásav
    vájves+A+Sg+Ill: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Sg+Ine: vájvvásin
    vájves+A+Sg+Ela: ruoppsadis
    vájves+A+Sg+Com: vájvvásijn
    vájves+A+Pl+Nom: vájvvása
    vájves+A+Pl+Gen: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Pl+Acc: vájvvásijt
    vájves+A+Pl+Ill: vájvvásijda
    vájves+A+Pl+Ine: vájvvásijn
    vájves+A+Pl+Ela: vájvvásijs
    vájves+A+Pl+Com: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Ess: vájvvásin
    vájves+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vájvvásabbo
    vájves+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vájvvásamos

  Adjective - dåhkkimahtes: # 
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Attr: vijdes 
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []
